trunk/incubator/apertium-hi.hi.dix
          <r>अ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>येंगी</l>
          <r>अ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ह्/ऐ__व्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ऊँ</l>
          <r>ऐ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:hE"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ऐ</l>
          <r>ऐ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:hE"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ऐ</l>
          <r>ऐ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:hE"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ऐं</l>
          <r>ऐ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:hE"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओ</l>
          <r>ऐ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:hE"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ऐं</l>
          <r>ऐ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:hE"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="है"><i>ह्</i><par n="ह्/ऐ__व्"/></e>
